Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20202-4105
Commission; members; terms.

The term of the member first appointed to serve district 1 shall expire on June 30, 2022; the term of the members first appointed to serve district 2 and district 4 shall expire on June 30, 2023; and the term of the members first appointed to serve district 3 and district 5 shall expire on June 30, 2024. As the terms of office of the initial commission members expire as provided in this section, their successors shall be appointed to serve for terms of three years and until their successors are appointed and qualified. A member appointed to fill a vacancy, occurring before the expiration of the term of a member separated from the commission for any cause, shall be appointed for the remainder of the term of the member whose office has been so vacated in the same manner as his or her predecessor. Each commission member may serve a maximum of three consecutive terms.

Laws 2020, LB803, § 5.
November 14, 2020